Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF153.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 321.449, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 3. Rules adopted under this section concerning driver age qualifications do not apply to drivers for private and for-hire motor carriers which operate solely intrastate except when the vehicle being driven is transporting a hazardous material in a quantity which requires placarding . The minimum age for the exempted intrastate operations is eighteen years of age. Sec. 2. Section 321.450, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 3. Notwithstanding other provisions of this section , or the age requirements under section 321.449 , the age requirements under section 321.449 and the rules adopted under this section pertaining to compliance with regulations adopted under United States Code, Tit. 49, and found in 49 C.F.R. Â§177.804 , shall not apply to retail dealers of fertilizers, petroleum products, and pesticides and their employees while delivering Senate File 153, p. 2 fertilizers, petroleum products, and pesticides to farm customers within a one-hundred-mile radius of their retail place of business. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 153, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor